District of Columbia statutes.
31-3706

Filing requirements; master policy and certificate.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any insurer who provides group Medicare supplement insurance benefits to a resident of the District shall file the master policy and certificate, as provided by rule issued pursuant to § 31-3710.

(b)

An insurer shall not be required to file the master policy and certificate within the 30-day period following the date that the insurance is provided if the policy is a master policy issued for delivery outside the District.

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 7, 39 DCR 5825
This section is referenced in § 31-3702.
1981 Ed., § 35-2616.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.